Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.060

Compliance with public works and procurement goals—Plan to maximize opportunity for minority and women-owned businesses.

(1) Each state agency and educational institution shall comply with the annual goals established for that agency or institution under this chapter for public works and procuring goods or services. This chapter applies to all public works and procurement by state agencies and educational institutions, including all contracts and other procurement under chapters 28B.10, 39.04, 39.26, 43.19, and 47.28 RCW.

(2) Each state agency shall adopt a plan, developed in consultation with the director and the advisory committee, to ensure that minority and women-owned businesses are afforded the maximum practicable opportunity to directly and meaningfully participate in the execution of public contracts for public works and goods and services. The plan shall include specific measures the agency will undertake to increase the participation of certified minority and women-owned businesses.

(3) Of all state agencies and educational institutions, the office must annually identify those: (a) In the lowest quintile of utilization of minority and women-owned contractors as a percentage of all contracts issued by the agency; (b) in the lowest quintile of the dollar value awarded to minority and women-owned contractors as a percentage of the dollar value of all contracts issued by the agency; and (c) that are performing significantly below their established goals, as determined by the office. The office must meet with each identified agency to review its plan and identify available tools and actions for increasing participation.

(4) The office shall annually notify the governor, the state auditor, and the joint legislative audit and review committee of all agencies and educational institutions not in compliance with this chapter.

[ 2021 c 160 s 2; 2019 c 434 s 3; 1996 c 288 s 28; 1993 c 512 s 9; 1983 c 120 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2019 c 434: See note following RCW 35.23.352.

Compliance with chapter 39.19 RCW: RCW 28B.10.023, 39.04.160, 39.26.245, 47.28.030, 47.28.050, 47.28.090.